West Virginia, session 2026, HB4237.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of Revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Division of Financial Institutions. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §31-17-3 of this code, modified by the Division of Financial Institutions to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 10, 2025, relating to the Division of Financial Institutions (residential mortgage lenders, brokers, and loan originators, 106 CSR 05), is authorized.